Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1242
Deposition, defined.

A deposition is a written declaration under oath or a videotape taken under oath in accordance with procedures provided by law, made upon notice to the adverse party for the purpose of enabling him to attend and cross-examine, or made upon written interrogatories.

R.S.1867, Code § 368, p. 455;

R.S.1913, § 7934;

C.S.1922, § 8876;

C.S.1929, § 20-1242;

R.S.1943, § 25-1242;

Laws 1973, LB 504, § 3.